en: No artificial colours or flavours, No artificial colours and flavours, No artificial colours and flavourings
bg: Без изкуствени оцветители или аромати
ca: Sense colorants ni aromes artificials
da: Ingen kunstige smags- eller farvestoffer
de: Keine künstlichen Farbstoffe oder Aromen
es: Sin colorantes o saborizantes artificiales
fi: ei keinotekoisia väriaineita tai aromeja, ei keinotekoisia väriaineita tai aromeja, ei keinotekoisia väri- tai makuaineita
fr: Sans colorants ni arômes artificiels
he: ללא צבעי מאכל או חומרים משמרים מלאכותיים
hr: bez umjetnih bojila i aroma
hu: Mesterséges színezék és ízesítők nélkül
it: Senza coloranti o aromi artificiali
nb: Ingen kunstige smakstilsetninger eller farger
nl: Zonder kunstmatige kleurstoffen of smaakstoffen
pt: Sem corantes nem aromas artificiais, sem corantes ou aromas artificiais, sem corantes e aromas artificiais
sv: Inga artificiella aromämnen eller färger
th: ไม่ใช้กลิ่นและสีสังเคราะห์

en: No artificial flavour enhancer, free from artificial flavour enhancers
ca: Sense potenciador del sabor artificial
de: Ohne künstliche Geschmaksverstärker
es: Sin potenciador artificial del sabor
fi: ei keinotekoisia arominvahventeita, ilman keinotekoisia arominvahventeita
fr: Sans exhausteurs de goût artificiels
hu: Mesterséges ízfokozó nélkül, mesterséges ízfokozót nem tartalmaz
it: Senza esaltatori artificiali di sapidità
nl: Zonder smaakversterkers
pl: Bez sztucznych wzmacniaczy smaku
pt: Sem intensificador de aroma artificial, sem intensificadores de aromas artificiais

en: No emulsifiers, without emulsifiers
bg: Без емулгатори
ca: Sense emulsiants
de: Ohne Emulgatoren
es: Sin emulsionantes
fi: Ei emulgointiaineita, ilman emulgointiaineita
fr: Sans émulsifiants
hr: bez emulgatora
hu: Emulgeálószerek nélkül
it: Senza emulsionanti
nl: Zonder emulgatoren
pl: Bez emulgatorów
pt: Sem emulsionantes
sv: Inga emulgeringsmedel, utan emulgeringsmedel

en: No aspartame, aspartame free, without aspartame
bg: Без аспартам
ca: Sense aspartam, Lliure d'aspartam
de: ohne Aspartam, aspartamfrei
es: Sin aspartamo, Sin aspartame
fi: aspartaamiton, ei aspartaamia, ilman aspartaamia
fr: Sans aspartame
hu: Aszpartámmentes, Aszpartám mentes, Aszpartám nélkül
it: Senza aspartame
nl: Zonder Aspartaam
pt: Sem aspartame, livre de aspartame, sem aspartamo, livre de aspartamo, 0% aspartame, 0% aspartamo

en: No Bisphenol-A, No BPA, BPA free, Bisphenol-A free
bg: Без бисфенол-А, Без BPA
de: Ohne Bisphenol-A
es: Sin bisfenol A, Sin BPA
fi: ei sisällä Bisfenoli-A:ta, Ei BPA:ta, BPA-vapaa
fr: Sans bisphénol-A, Sans BPA
hu: BPA-mentes
it: Senza BPA
nl: Zonder bisfenol A
pt: Sem Bisfenol A, sem Bisfenol-A, sem BPA
sv: fri från bisfenol A

en: No caffeine, caffeine free, without caffeine
bg: Без кофеин
ca: Sense cafeïna, lliure de cafeïna
de: Koffeinfrei
es: Sin cafeína
fi: kofeiiniton, ilman kofeiinia
fr: Sans caféine, sans théine
hr: bez kofeina
hu: Koffeinmentes
it: Senza caffeina
nl: Cafeinevrij, Vrij van cafeine, Zonder cafeine
pl: Bez kofeiny
pt: Sem cafeína, livre de cafeína, 0% cafeína
si: brez kofeina
th: ไม่มีคาเฟอีน

en: with caffeine
bg: С кофеин
ca: amb cafeïna
de: mit Koffein
es: con cafeína
fi: kofeiinilla
fr: avec caféine
hr: s kofeinom
hu: koffeinnel
it: con caffeina
nl: met cafeïne
pl: z kofeiną
pt: com cafeína
ru: с кофеином
th: มีคาเฟอีน

en: high caffeine content
sv: hög koffeinhalt

en: 100% arabica
xx: 100% arabica
bg: 100% Арабика

en: No cholesterol, cholesterol-free, without cholesterol
bg: Без холестерол
ca: Sense colesterol, Lliure de colesterol
de: cholesterinfrei, ohne Cholesteri
es: Sin colesterol
fi: kolesteroliton, ilman kolesterolia
fr: sans cholestérol
he: ללא כולסטרול, נטול כולסטרול
hu: Koleszterinmentes
it: Senza colesterolo
nl: Cholesterolvrij, Zonder cholesterol
pl: Bez cholesterolu
pt: Sem colesterol, livre de colesterol, 0% colesterol
ru: без холестерина
th: ไม่มีคอเลสเตอรอล

en: No colorings, no added colorings, No colours
ar: بدون ملونات
bg: Без оцветители
ca: Sense colorants, sense colorants afegits
cs: Bez přidaných barviv
da: Uden farvestoffer
de: Ohne Farbstoffzusatz, Ohne Zusatz von Farbstoffen, Ohne Farbstoffe
es: Sin colorantes, Sin colorantes añadidos
fi: väriaineeton, ei väriaineita, ei lisättyjä väriaineita
fr: Sans colorants, sans colorant ajouté, sans ajout de colorant
he: ללא צבעי מאכל, ללא תוספת צבעי מאכל
hr: bez bojila
hu: Hozzáadott színezőanyag nélkül, Színezőanyag nélkül, színezőanyag mentes, színezőanyagmentes, Nincs hozzáadott színezőanyag
it: Senza coloranti
ja: 着色料不使用
ko: 색소 무첨가
nl: Zonder kleurstoffen
pl: Bez barwników, bez dodatku barwników
pt: Sem corantes, sem corantes adicionados, 0% corantes
ru: без красителей
th: ไม่เติมสี
tr: Renklendirici yok, Renklendiricisiz
zh: 无色素

en: No eggs, egg free
bg: Без яйца
ca: Sense ou, Lliure d'ou
da: Uden æg
de: Ohne Ei
es: Sin huevo, Sin huevos
fi: kananmunaton, munaton, ei kananmunaa
fr: Sans œufs
he: ללא ביצים, נטול ביצים
hu: Tojás nélkül
it: Senza uova, Senza uovo
nl: Zonder eieren
pt: Sem ovos, sem ovo, 0% ovos
sv: Utan ägg
th: ไม่มีส่วนผสมของไข่

en: No flavors, no added flavors, no added flavours
ca: Sense aromes afegits
de: Ohne Zusatz von Aromen, Ohne Zusatz von Aromastoffen, Ohne Aromen, ohne Aromastoffzusatz
es: Sin aromas, Sin aromas añadidos
fi: aromiaineeton, ei lisättyjä aromeja
fr: sans arômes ajoutés, sans arômes, sans arôme
he: ללא חומרי טעם
hr: bez aroma, bez dodanih aroma, bez pojačivača arome
hu: Hozzáadott aromák nélkül, hozzáadott aromát nem tartalmaz
it: Senza aromi
nl: Zonder toegevoegde smaakstoffen
pl: Bez aromatów
pt: Sem aromas adicionados, sem aromas, sem sabores, sem sabores adicionados
ru: без ароматизаторов
th: ไม่เติมกลิ่น

en: No flavour enhancer
ca: Sense potenciador de sabor
de: Ohne Geschmacksverstärker, Ohne Zusatz von Geschmackverstärkern, Ohne Zusatzstoff Geschmacksverstärker
es: Sin potenciadores del sabor
fi: ei arominvahventeita
fr: sans exhausteur de goût, sans exhausteurs de goût
he: ללא מחזקי טעם
hr: bez pojačivača okusa, bez dodanih pojačivača okusa
hu: ízfokozómentes, ízfokozó mentes, ízfokozó nélkül, ízfokozót nem tartalmaz
it: Senza esaltatori di sapidità
nl: Geen toegevoegde smaakstoffen
pl: Bez wzmacniaczy smaku
pt: Sem intensificador de sabor, sem intensificador de sabores, sem intesificadores de sabores

en: High in saturated fats
es: Alto en grasas saturadas

en: low saturated fat, low content of saturated fat
xx: low saturated fat
bg: Ниско съдържание на наситени мазнини
ca: baix contingut de greixos saturats
de: geringer Gehalt an gesättigten Fettsäuren
es: bajo contenido de grasas saturadas
fi: vähäinen määrä tyydyttyneitä rasvoja
fr: faible teneur en graisses saturées
hr: nizka vsebnost nasičenih maščob
hu: alacsony telített zsírtartalom
it: basso contenuto di grassi saturi
nl: laag gehalte aan verzadigde vetzuren
pl: niski poziom tłuszczu nasyconego
pt: baixo teor de gordura saturada
ru: низкое содержание насыщенных жиров
th: ปริมาณไขมันอิ่มตัวต่ำ
tr: düşük doymuş yağ içeriği
zh: 低饱和脂肪含量

en: No saturated fat, saturated fat-free
xx: No saturated fat, saturated fat-free
bg: без наситени мазнини
ca: sense greixos saturats
de: ohne gesättigte Fettsäuren
es: sin grasas saturadas
fi: täysin kyllästetty rasvaton
fr: sans matières grasses saturées
hr: bez zasićenih masti
hu: telített zsírmentes
it: senza grassi saturi
nl: zonder verzadigde vetzuren
pl: bez tłuszczu nasyconego
pt: sem gordura saturada
ru: без насыщенных жиров
th: ไม่มีไขมันอิ่มตัว
tr: doymuş yağ içermeyen
zh: 无饱和脂肪

en: No Trans fat, 0% Trans fat, 0 g trans fat, 0g trans fat, trans fat free
bg: Без трансмазнини
ca: Sense greixos Trans, 0% de greixos Trans
de: Ohne Transfette
es: Sin ácidos grasos trans, Sin grasas trans, Libre de grasas trans, 0g grasas trans
fi: transrasvaton, 0% transrasvaa, 0 g transrasvaa, 0g transrasvaa
fr: Sans acides gras trans, sans graisses trans
hr: bez transmasnih kiselina, bez trans masnih kiselina
hu: Transzzsírsavmentes, Transzzsírsav nélkül, 0g transzzsírsav, transzzsírsavat nem tartalmaz
it: Senza grassi trans
nl: Geen transvetten
pt: Sem gordura trans, sem gorduras trans, 0% gordura trans, 0% gorduras trans
ru: без трансжиров
th: ไม่มีไขมันทรานส์

en: No hydrogenated fats, hydrogenated fats free, free hydrogenated fats
bg: Без хидрогенирани мазнини
ca: Sense greixos hidrogenats
de: Keine gehärtete Fette, Ohne gehärtete Fette
es: Sin grasas hidrogenadas
fi: ei kovetettuja rasvoja, ei hydrogenoituja rasvoja
fr: Sans matière grasse hydrogénée, Sans matières grasses hydrogénées, Sans graisses hydrogénées, Sans utilisation de matières grasses hydrogénées, Sans huiles hydrogénées, Sans huile hydrogénée, Pas de graisses hydrogénées, Aucune graisse hydrogénée
hr: bez hidrogeniziranih masti
hu: Hidrogénezett zsír nélkül, hidrogénezett zsírt nem tartalmaz
it: Senza grassi idrogenati
pt: Sem gorduras hidrogenadas, sem gordura hidrogenada

en: without oil
bg: без масло
ca: sense oli
de: ohne Öl
es: sin aceite
fi: ilman öljyä
fr: sans huile
hr: bez ulja
hu: olaj nélkül
it: senza olio
nl: zonder olie
pt: sem óleo
ru: без масла
zh: 无油